Utah statutes.
53A-1-610.   Grade specification replacement.

(1)  The State Board of Education may replace the grade specification for the administration of specific tests under this part with a specification of age or time elapsed since the student entered school if the replacement specification is more consistent with patterns of school organization.

(2)  The board shall submit a report to the Legislature explaining the reasons for replacing the grade specification.  The board shall submit the report at least six months prior to the anticipated change.



Enacted by Chapter 267, 1990 General Session

